Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB715.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 12 of the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, is amended to read:Section 12. Penalties.--(a) Any employer and his or her agent, or the officer or agent of any corporation, who discharges or in any other manner discriminates against any employe because such employe has testified or is about to testify before the secretary or his or her representative in any investigation or proceeding under or related to this act, or 12345678910111213141516171819 because such employer believes that said employe may so testify shall, upon conviction thereof in a summary proceeding, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than [five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000)] one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), and in default of the payment of such fine and costs, shall be sentenced to imprisonment for not less than ten days nor more than ninety days.(b) Any employer or the officer or agent of any corporation who pays or agrees to pay any employe less than the rates applicable to such employe under this act shall, upon conviction thereof [in a summary proceeding, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than seventy-five dollars ($75) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300) or to undergo imprisonment of not less than ten nor more than sixty days, or both.], be sentenced to the following:(1) A summary offense for a first offense if the total wages due were less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150).(2) A misdemeanor of the second degree for a second offense and if the total wages due were less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150).(3) A misdemeanor of the first degree for a first or second offense if the total wages due were more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150).(4) A felony of the third degree for a third or subsequent offense regardless of the total amount of wages due.(b.1) Each week in which such employe is paid less than the rate applicable to him or her under this act and for each employe who is paid less than the prescribed rate, a separate 20250HB0715PN0734 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 offense shall be deemed to occur. Any agreement between the employer and the employe to work for less than the applicable wage rate shall be no defense to action by the Commonwealth under this section.(c) Any employer or the officer or agent of any corporation who violates any other provision of this act or of any regulation issued thereunder shall, upon conviction thereof in a summary proceeding, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than [one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500)] three hundred dollars ($300) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), and each day of such failure to comply with this act or regulation, shall constitute a separate offense.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0715PN0734 - 3 - 1234567891011121314